Utah statutes.
58-60-308.   Scope of practice -- Limitations.

(1)  A licensed marriage and family therapist may engage in all acts and practices defined as the practice of marriage and family therapy without supervision, in private and independent practice, or as an employee of another person, limited only by the licensee's education, training, and competence.

(2) (a)  To the extent an individual has completed the educational requirements of Subsection 58-60-305(1)(d), a licensed associate marriage and family therapist may engage in all acts and practices defined as the practice of marriage and family therapy if the practice is:

(i)  within the scope of employment as a licensed associate marriage and family therapist with a public agency or a private clinic as defined by division rule; and

(ii)  under the supervision of a licensed marriage and family therapist who is qualified as a supervisor under Section 58-60-307.

(b)  A licensed associate marriage and family therapist may not engage in the independent practice of marriage and family therapy.

